Utah statutes.
17B-1-620.   Transfer of appropriation balance between accounts in same fund.

(1)  The board of trustees of each local district shall establish policies for the transfer of any unencumbered or unexpended appropriation balance or portion of the balance from one account in a fund to another account within the same fund, subject to Subsection (2).

(2)  An appropriation for debt retirement and interest, reduction of deficit, or other appropriation required by law or covenant may not be reduced below the minimums required.

